District of Columbia statutes.
35-236

Subsidy payments authorized; audit; interest credit for advance payment.

(a)

The Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority shall certify to the Mayor, as soon as practicable, following the end of each calendar month:

(1)

The amount that is the difference between the total number of all Metrobus student fare tickets or tokens collected by the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority during such calendar month for the transportation of students on the Metrobus Transit System times the average of the regular single trip Metrobus fare charged within the District of Columbia during the peak and off-peak hours, or such other amount as may hereinafter be agreed to by the Mayor and the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority, pursuant to a student passenger survey or other appropriate method, and the total of all such Metrobus student fare tickets or tokens sold during such calendar month times the reduced student fare as determined in § 35-233.

(2)

The amount that is the difference between the total of all fares that would have been paid to the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority during such calendar month by students for transportation on the Metrorail System, if such fares had been paid at the otherwise applicable regular adult Metrorail fare for each trip made by students during that month, and the total of all money collected by the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority during such calendar month in connection with the sale of Metrorail student farecards.

(b)

The Mayor, upon receiving any such certification, shall pay the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority, subject to an audit acceptable to the Mayor, the amounts contained therein. The Mayor is authorized to make advance subsidy payments to the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority; provided, that the District of Columbia shall receive an appropriate interest credit from the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority for each such advance payment; and provided further, that the exercise of such authority shall not affect the certification and audit requirements.

Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-152, § 2, 25 DCR 2534
Sept. 26, 1981, D.C. Law 4-33, § 2(d), 28 DCR 3187
This section is referenced in § 9-1111.15.
1981 Ed., § 44-220.
1973 Ed., § 44-214.5.